California, session 20252026, SB46.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 6041 of the Elections Code is amended to read:6041. (a) Except as provided in Section 6901.7, the Secretary of State shall place the name of a candidate upon the presidential primary ballot when the Secretary of State has determined that the candidate is generally advocated for or recognized throughout the United States or California as actively seeking the nomination of the Democratic Party for President of the United States. The Secretary of State shall include as criteria for selecting candidates the fact of qualifying for funding under the Federal Elections Campaign Act of 1974, as amended.(b) On or before the 88th day preceding a presidential primary election, the Secretary of State shall publicly announce and distribute to the news media for publication a list of the selected candidates that the Secretary of State intends to place on the ballot at the following presidential primary election.SEC. 2. Section 6340 of the Elections Code is amended to read:6340. (a) Except as provided in Section 6901.7, the Secretary of State shall place the name of a candidate upon the Republican presidential primary ballot when the Secretary of State has determined that the candidate is generally advocated for or recognized throughout the United States or California as a candidate for the nomination of the Republican Party for President of the United States.(b) On or before the 88th day preceding a presidential primary election the Secretary of State shall publicly announce and distribute to the news media for publication a list of the candidates the Secretary of State intends to place on the ballot at the following presidential primary election. Following this announcement, the Secretary of State may add candidates to the Secretary of State’s selection, but the Secretary of State shall not delete any candidate whose name appears on the announced list, except as provided in Section 6901.7.SEC. 3. Section 6520 of the Elections Code is amended to read:6520. (a) Except as provided in Section 6901.7, the Secretary of State shall place the name of a candidate upon the American Independent Party presidential preference ballot when the Secretary of State has determined that the candidate is generally advocated for or recognized in the news media throughout the United States or California as actively seeking the nomination of the American Independent Party for President of the United States.(b) On or before the 88th day preceding a presidential primary election, the Secretary of State shall publicly announce and distribute to the news media for publication a list of the candidates the Secretary of State intends to place on the ballot at the following presidential primary election. Following this announcement, the Secretary of State may add candidates to the Secretary of State’s selection, but the Secretary of State may not delete any candidate whose name appears on the announced list, except as provided in Section 6901.7.SEC. 4. Section 6720 of the Elections Code is amended to read:6720. Except as provided in Section 6901.7, the Secretary of State shall place the name of a candidate upon the Peace and Freedom Party presidential preference ballot when the Secretary of State has determined that the candidate is generally advocated for or recognized throughout the United States or California as actively seeking the presidential nomination of the Peace and Freedom Party or the national party with which the Peace and Freedom Party is affiliated.SEC. 5. Section 6722 of the Elections Code is amended to read:6722. On or before the 88th day preceding a presidential primary election, the Secretary of State shall publicly announce and distribute to the news media for publication a list of the candidates the Secretary of State intends to place on the ballot at the following presidential primary election. Following this announcement, the Secretary of State may add to the Secretary of State’s selection, but the Secretary of State may not delete any candidate whose name appears on the announced list, except as provided in Section 6901.7. The Secretary of State shall mail a copy of the list and any subsequent additions thereto to the Chairpersons of the Peace and Freedom Party State and County Central Committees.SEC. 6. Section 6851 of the Elections Code is amended to read:6851. Except as provided in Section 6901.7, the Secretary of State shall place the name of a candidate upon the Green Party presidential preference primary ballot when the Secretary of State has determined that the candidate is generally advocated for or recognized throughout the United States or California as actively seeking the presidential nomination of the Green Party or the national political party with which the Green Party is affiliated.SEC. 7. Section 6852 of the Elections Code is amended to read:6852. On or before the 88th day preceding a presidential primary election, the Secretary of State shall publicly announce and distribute to the news media for publication a list of the candidates the Secretary of State intends to place on the ballot at the following presidential primary election. Following this announcement, the Secretary of State may add candidates to the Secretary of State’s selection, but the Secretary of State may not delete any candidate whose name appears on the announced list, except as provided in Section 6901.7. The Secretary of State shall mail a copy of the list and any subsequent additions to the list to the Green Party Liaison to the Secretary of State.SEC. 8. Section 6901 of the Elections Code is amended to read:6901. Whenever a political party, in accordance with Section 6864, 7100, 7300, 7578, or 7843, submits to the Secretary of State its certified list of nominees for electors and alternate electors of President and Vice President of the United States, the Secretary of State shall notify each candidate for elector and alternate elector of the elector’s nomination by the party. Except as provided in Section 6901.7, the Secretary of State shall cause the names of the candidates for President and Vice President of the United States of the several political parties to be placed upon the ballot for the ensuing general election.SEC. 9. Section 6901.7 is added to the Elections Code, to read:6901.7. (a) (1)A person is eligible to be a candidate for President or Vice President of the United States in a presidential primary or general election only if that person has the qualifications to be elected to or hold that office as set forth in the United States Constitution on the date the term of that office begins.(2)(b) (1) The Secretary of State shall not certify the name of any candidate for the office of President or Vice President of the United States, and shall not place the candidate’s name on the ballot, if the candidate does not affirm, under oath, that the candidate will fully meet the qualifications to be elected to and hold the office of President or Vice President of the United States.(b)If the Secretary of State has reasonable suspicion based on articulable fact that a candidate for President or Vice President of the United States does not meet the qualifications to be elected to or hold office as set forth in the United States Constitution, the Secretary of State shall investigate the candidate’s qualifications and may request that the candidate provide proof of their constitutional eligibility to be elected to and hold office before placing their name on the ballot.(2) If the Secretary of State determines that election of a candidate for the office of President or Vice President of the United States would violate the United States Constitution, the Secretary of State shall not certify the name of the candidate or place it on the ballot. Whenever any such determination is made, the Secretary of State shall issue a public notice memorializing the determination and shall publicly announce and distribute that determination to the news media for publication.(3) (A) If the Secretary of State concludes that further investigation is needed to determine whether election of a candidate for the office of President or Vice President of the United States would violate the United States Constitution, the Secretary of State may refer the matter to the Attorney General for investigation.(B) To assist in any investigation under subparagraph (A), the Attorney General may appoint an independent special counsel for the purpose of investigating the constitutional qualifications of any candidate for the office of President or Vice President of the United States if there is a reasonable suspicion that a candidate does not meet the qualifications.(C) If the Attorney General or a special counsel appointed under subparagraph (B) determines that a candidate for President or Vice President of the United States does not meet the qualifications for office, the Secretary of State shall not certify the name of the candidate or place it on the ballot. Whenever any such determination is made, the Attorney General shall issue a public notice memorializing the determination and shall publicly announce and distribute that determination to the news media for publication.(4) For a presidential primary election, the Secretary of State, Attorney General, or special counsel shall not determine a candidate is ineligible for President or Vice President of the United States pursuant to this subdivision later than the 88th day preceding the election. For a presidential general election, the Secretary of State, Attorney General, or special counsel shall not determine a candidate is ineligible for President or Vice President of the United States pursuant to this subdivision later than the 73rd day preceding the election.(c) (1) (A) An elector may challenge the qualifications of a candidate for President or Vice President of the United States by filing a verified petition setting forth the facts alleged concerning the qualifications of the candidate in the Superior Court of the County of Sacramento.(B) If the Secretary of State does not certify a candidate for President or Vice President of the United States for failure to State, the Attorney General, or a special counsel determines a candidate for President or Vice President of the United States does not meet the qualifications of office, that candidate may challenge the Secretary of State’s determination by filing a verified petition setting forth the facts alleged concerning the qualifications of the candidate in the Superior Court of the County of Sacramento.(2) (A) For a presidential primary election, a petition brought pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) shall be filed no later than the 85th day preceding the election. For a presidential general election, a petition brought pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) shall be filed no later than the 72nd day preceding the election.(2)(B) For either a presidential primary election or a presidential general election, a petition brought pursuant to paragraph (1) subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) shall be filed no later than five days 72 hours after the date on which the Secretary of State issues the certified list of candidates for the election pursuant to Section 8120 or Section 8148. a determination is made that a candidate for President or Vice President of the United States does not meet the qualifications of office. For a presidential general election, a petition brought pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) shall be filed no later than 24 hours after the date on which a determination is made that a candidate for President or Vice President of the United States does not meet the qualifications of office.(3) The (A) (i) For the presidential primary election, the hearing on the qualifications of the candidate in a challenge brought pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) shall be held not less than five two nor more than ten four days after the date on which the Secretary of State issues the certified list of candidates for the election. the petition is filed. The court shall hear testimony and other evidence and, within 48 hours after the close of the hearing, determine whether the candidate has the qualifications to be elected to or hold the office for which the candidate has declared.(ii) For the presidential general election, the hearing on the qualifications of the candidate in a challenge brought pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) shall be held not more than 24 hours after the petition is filed. The court shall hear testimony and other evidence but the hearing shall conclude not more than 48 hours after it begins. Within 24 hours after the close of the hearing, the court shall determine whether the candidate has the qualifications to be elected to or hold the office for which the candidate has declared.(B) A hearing on the qualifications of a candidate who brings a petition pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) shall be held not less than two nor more than four days after the petition is filed. The court shall hear testimony and other evidence and, within 48 hours after the close of the hearing, determine whether the candidate has the qualifications to be elected to or hold the office.(4) In an action brought by an elector to challenge a candidate’s qualifications for office, the elector has the burden to sustain the challenge by a preponderance of the evidence. In an action brought by a candidate to challenge the candidate’s exclusion from the ballot by the Secretary of State, the Secretary of State has the burden of sustaining the candidate’s exclusion from the ballot by a preponderance of the evidence.SEC. 10. Section 13314 of the Elections Code is amended to read:13314. (a) (1) An elector may seek a writ of mandate alleging that an error or omission has occurred, or is about to occur, in the placing of a name on, or in the printing of, a ballot, county voter information guide, state voter information guide, or other official matter, or that any neglect of duty has occurred, or is about to occur.(2) A peremptory writ of mandate shall issue only upon proof of both of the following:(A) That the error, omission, or neglect is in violation of this code or the Constitution.(B) (i) That issuance of the writ will not substantially interfere with the conduct of the election.(ii) For purposes of this subparagraph, the Secretary of State not placing the name of a candidate on the ballot for failure to meet the constitutional eligibility requirements to be elected to or hold office pursuant to Section 6901.7 will not substantially interfere with the conduct of the election.(3) The action or appeal shall have priority over all other civil matters.(4) The Secretary of State shall be named as a respondent or a real party in interest in any proceeding under this section concerning a measure or a candidate described in Section 15375, except for a candidate for judge of the superior court.(5) If the error or omission involves the Secretary of State placing or refusing to place a constitutionally ineligible candidate for President or Vice President of the United States on the ballot, subdivision (c) of Section 6901.7 applies to an action for a writ of mandate brought pursuant to this section.(b) Venue for a proceeding under this section shall be exclusively in Sacramento County in any of the following cases:(1) The Secretary of State is named as a real party in interest or as a respondent.(2) A candidate for statewide elective office is named as a party.(3) A statewide measure that is to be placed on the ballot is the subject of the proceeding.SEC. 11. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.